Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2230
Purpose of sections.

The purpose of sections 81-2229 to 81-2235 shall be to provide for care management units which include ongoing consultation, assessment, care plan development, referral, and review for individuals, primarily older Nebraskans, in need of long-term care. With the individual's approval, the care management unit shall help coordinate the developed plan of care using the most appropriate available public and private resources to meet the individual's long-term care needs.

Laws 1987, LB 42, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 876.